North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE VIII EDUCATION

Section 147.

Renumbered as Article VIII, § 1.

Section 148.

Renumbered as Article VIII, § 2.

Section 149.

Renumbered as Article VIII, § 3.

Section 150.

Renumbered as Article VII, § 9.

Section 151.

Renumbered as Article VIII, § 4.

Section 152.

Renumbered as Article VIII, § 5.